Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.060

Initial decision or proposal for decision—Findings of fact and conclusions of law—Inapplicability to state patrol disciplinary hearings.

When an administrative law judge presides at a hearing under this chapter and a majority of the officials of the agency who are to render the final decision have not heard substantially all of the oral testimony and read all exhibits submitted by any party, it shall be the duty of such judge, or in the event of his or her unavailability or incapacity, of another judge appointed by the chief administrative law judge, to issue an initial decision or proposal for decision including findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with RCW 34.05.461 or 34.05.485. However, this section does not apply to a state patrol disciplinary hearing conducted under RCW 43.43.090.

[ 2011 c 336 s 763; 1989 c 175 s 34; 1984 c 141 s 7; 1982 c 189 s 2; 1981 c 67 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective date—1982 c 189: See note following RCW 34.12.020.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.